North Dakota, session 69, HB1264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY - WHITESTONE HILL
STATE HISTORIC SITE IMPROVEMENTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out
of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$75,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the state historical society for the
purpose of constructing a bridge at the Whitestone Hill state historic site, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. This funding is considered a one-time
funding item.
Page No. 1 25.0872.01000